Utah statutes.
31A-2-111.   Delegation.

(1)  Any power, duty, or function vested in the commissioner by law may be exercised, discharged, or performed by an employee of the Insurance Department acting in the commissioner's name and under his delegated authority.

(2)  Any person whose own course of action depends in good faith upon proof of the validity of an alleged delegation is not obligated to act until shown a written delegation of the commissioner with the signature of the commissioner or deputy commissioner.

